Massachusetts, session 194th, S1248.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 151B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 3, after the word “corporations”, the 
following words:- , public interest organizations.  
SECTION 2. Said section 1 of said chapter 151B, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting after paragraph 23 the following paragraph:-   
24. The term “public interest organization” shall mean any non-profit organization which 
is organized or operating in whole or in part for the purpose of combating discrimination or bias, 
of safeguarding civil rights or of promoting interests or rights under this chapter.  
SECTION 3. Section 5 of said chapter 151B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting, after the first sentence, the following sentence:- Without limiting or excluding any 
other basis for a complaint, a public interest organization may be aggrieved if a purpose or 
activities to achieve that purpose were perceptively impaired by an alleged unlawful practice or 

of 2 13 violation; or if an alleged unlawful practice or violation was directed at the public interest 
organization or its agents or employees; or where the public interest organization has a sufficient 
nexus to the interests of the person or persons whose interests are harmed by an alleged unlawful 
practice or violation.  
SECTION 4. Section 9 of chapter 151B, as so appearing, is hereby amended in the 
second paragraph by inserting, after the first sentence, the following sentence:- Without limiting 
or excluding any other basis for a civil action, a public interest organization may be aggrieved if 
a purpose or activities to achieve that purpose were perceptively impaired by an alleged unlawful 
practice; or if an alleged unlawful practice was directed at the public interest organization or its 
agents or employees; or where the public interest organization has a sufficient nexus to the 
interests of the person or persons whose interests are harmed by an alleged unlawful practice.